en_US.aff
FLAG num
SFX 18 Y 3	
SFX 18 0 ්තු  .	
SFX 18 0 ්තුත්  .	
SFX 18 0 ්තුයි  .	

SFX 19 Y 58	
SFX 19 0 ්නා .	
SFX 19 0 ්නාත්  .	
SFX 19 0 ්නායි  .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෙක් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෙකි .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෙකුත් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෝ  .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෝත්  .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෝයි  .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෙකු .	
SFX 19 0 ්නකු .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෙකුත් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෙකි .	
SFX 19 0 ්නකුත් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නකුයි .	
SFX 19 0 ්නන්  .	
SFX 19 0 ්නනුත්  .	
SFX 19 0 ්නනි  .	
SFX 19 0 ්නාට .	
SFX 19 0 ්නාටත් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නාටයි .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෙකුට .	
SFX 19 0 ෙකුටත් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෙකුටයි .	
SFX 19 0 ්නකුට .	
SFX 19 0 ්නකුටත් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නකුටයි .	
SFX 19 0 ්නන්ට .	
SFX 19 0 ්නන්ටත් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නන්ටයි .	
SFX 19 0 ාගෙන් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නාගෙනුත් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නාගෙනි .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෙකුගෙන් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෙකුගෙනුත් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෙකුගෙනි .	
SFX 19 0 ්නකුගෙන් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නකුගෙනුත් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නකුගෙනි .	
SFX 19 0 ්නන්ගෙන් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නන්ගෙනුත් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නන්ගෙනි .	
SFX 19 0 ්නාගේ .	
SFX 19 0 ්නාගේත් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නාගේයි .	
SFX 19 0 ්නාගෙ .	
SFX 19 0 ්නාගෙත් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නාගෙයි .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෙකුගේ .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෙකුගේත් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නෙකුගේයි .	
SFX 19 0 ්නකුගේ .	
SFX 19 0 ්නකුගේත් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නකුගේයි .	
SFX 19 0 ්නන්ගේ .	
SFX 19 0 ්නන්ගේත් .	
SFX 19 0 ්නන්ගේයි .	
SFX 19 0 ්නනි .	

SFX 20 Y 46	
SFX 20 0 ා .	
SFX 20 0 ාත්  .	
SFX 20 0 ායි  .	
SFX 20 0 ෙක් .	
SFX 20 0 ෙකි .	
SFX 20 0 ෙකුත් .	
SFX 20 0 ෝ  .	
SFX 20 0 ෝත්  .	
SFX 20 0 ෝයි  .	
SFX 20 0 ෙකු .	
SFX 20 0 ෙකුත් .	
SFX 20 0 ෙකි .	
SFX 20 0 න්  .	
SFX 20 0 නුත්  .	
SFX 20 0 නි  .	
SFX 20 0 ාට .	
SFX 20 0 ාටත් .	
SFX 20 0 ාටයි .	
SFX 20 0 ෙකුට .	
SFX 20 0 ෙකුටත් .	
SFX 20 0 ෙකුටයි .	
SFX 20 0 න්ට .	
SFX 20 0 න්ටත් .	
SFX 20 0 න්ටයි .	
SFX 20 0 ාගෙන් .	
SFX 20 0 ාගෙනුත් .	
SFX 20 0 ාගෙනි .	
SFX 20 0 ෙකුගෙන් .	
SFX 20 0 ෙකුගෙනුත් .	
SFX 20 0 ෙකුගෙනි .	
SFX 20 0 න්ගෙන් .	
SFX 20 0 න්ගෙනුත් .	
SFX 20 0 න්ගෙනි .	
SFX 20 0 ාගේ .	
SFX 20 0 ාගේත් .	
SFX 20 0 ාගේයි .	
SFX 20 0 ගෙ .	
SFX 20 0 ගෙත් .	
SFX 20 0 ගෙයි .	
SFX 20 0 ෙකුගේ .	
SFX 20 0 ෙකුගේත් .	
SFX 20 0 ෙකුගේයි .	
SFX 20 0 න්ගේ .	
SFX 20 0 න්ගේත් .	
SFX 20 0 න්ගේයි .	
SFX 20 0 නි .	

SFX 22 Y 58	
SFX 22 0 ා  .	
SFX 22 0 ාත්  .	
SFX 22 0 ායි  .	
SFX 22 0 ෙක් .	
SFX 22 0 ෙකි .	
SFX 22 0 ෙකුත් .	
SFX 22 0 ෙකු .	
SFX 22 0 කු .	
SFX 22 0 ෙකි .	
SFX 22 0 ෙකුත් .	
SFX 22 0 කුයි .	
SFX 22 0 කුත් .	
SFX 22 0 ෝ  .	
SFX 22 0 ෝත්  .	
SFX 22 0 ෝයි  .	
SFX 22 0 න්  .	
SFX 22 0 නුත්  .	
SFX 22 0 නි  .	
SFX 22 0 ාට .	
SFX 22 0 ාටත් .	
SFX 22 0 ාටයි .	
SFX 22 0 ෙකුට .	
SFX 22 0 ෙකුටත් .	
SFX 22 0 ෙකුටයි .	
SFX 22 0 කුට .	
SFX 22 0 කුටත් .	
SFX 22 0 කුටයි .	
SFX 22 0 න්ට .	
SFX 22 0 න්ටත් .	
SFX 22 0 න්ටයි .	
SFX 22 0 ාගෙන් .	
SFX 22 0 ාගෙනුත් .	
SFX 22 0 ාගෙනි .	
SFX 22 0 ෙකුගෙන් .	
SFX 22 0 ෙකුගෙනුත් .	
SFX 22 0 ෙකුගෙනි .	
SFX 22 0 කුගෙන් .	
SFX 22 0 කුගෙනුත් .	
SFX 22 0 කුගෙනි .	
SFX 22 0 න්ගෙන් .	
SFX 22 0 න්ගෙනුත් .	
SFX 22 0 න්ගෙනි .	
SFX 22 0 ාගේ .	
SFX 22 0 ාගේත් .	
SFX 22 0 ාගේයි .	
SFX 22 0 ගෙ .	
SFX 22 0 ගෙත් .	
SFX 22 0 ගෙයි .	
SFX 22 0 ෙකුගේ .	
SFX 22 0 ෙකුගේත් .	
SFX 22 0 ෙකුගේයි .	
SFX 22 0 කුගේ .	
SFX 22 0 කුගේත් .	
SFX 22 0 කුගේයි .	
SFX 22 0 න්ගේ .	
SFX 22 0 න්ගේත් .	
SFX 22 0 න්ගේයි .	
SFX 22 0 නි .	

SFX 23 Y 56
SFX 23 0 ා  .
SFX 23 0 ාත්  .
SFX 23 0 ායි  .
SFX 23 0 ෙක් .
SFX 23 0 ෙකි .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුත් .
SFX 23 0 ෙකු .
SFX 23 0 කු .
SFX 23 0 ෙකි .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුත් .
SFX 23 0 කුයි .
SFX 23 0 කුත් .
SFX 23 0 න්  .
SFX 23 0 නුත්  .
SFX 23 0 නි  .
SFX 23 0 ාට .
SFX 23 0 ාටත් .
SFX 23 0 ාටයි .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුට .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුටත් .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුටයි .
SFX 23 0 කුට .
SFX 23 0 කුටත් .
SFX 23 0 කුටයි .
SFX 23 0 න්ට .
SFX 23 0 න්ටත් .
SFX 23 0 න්ටයි .
SFX 23 0 ාගෙන් .
SFX 23 0 ාගෙනුත් .
SFX 23 0 ාගෙනි .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුගෙන් .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුගෙනුත් .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුගෙනි .
SFX 23 0 කුගෙන් .
SFX 23 0 කුගෙනුත් .
SFX 23 0 කුගෙනි .
SFX 23 0 න්ගෙන් .
SFX 23 0 න්ගෙනුත් .
SFX 23 0 න්ගෙනි .
SFX 23 0 ාගේ .
SFX 23 0 ාගේත් .
SFX 23 0 ාගේයි .
SFX 23 0 ගෙ .
SFX 23 0 ගෙත් .
SFX 23 0 ගෙයි .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුගේ .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුගේත් .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුගේයි .
SFX 23 0 කුගේ .
SFX 23 0 කුගේත් .
SFX 23 0 කුගේයි .
SFX 23 0 න්ගේ .
SFX 23 0 න්ගේත් .
SFX 23 0 න්ගේයි .
SFX 23 0 නි .
SFX 23 0 ෝ .

SFX 24 Y  47	
SFX 24 0 ා  .	
SFX 24 0 ාත්  .	
SFX 24 0 ායි  .	
SFX 24 0 ෙක් .	
SFX 24 0 ෙකි .	
SFX 24 0 ෙකුත් .	
SFX 24 0 ු  .	
SFX 24 0 ුත්  .	
SFX 24 0 ුයි  .	
SFX 24 0 ෙකු .	
SFX 24 0 ෙකුත් .	
SFX 24 0 ෙකුයි .	
SFX 24 0 ුන්  .	
SFX 24 0 ුනුත්  .	
SFX 24 0 ුනි  .	
SFX 24 0 ාට .	
SFX 24 0 ාටත් .	
SFX 24 0 ාටයි .	
SFX 24 0 ෙකුට .	
SFX 24 0 ෙකුටත් .	
SFX 24 0 ෙකුටයි .	
SFX 24 0 ුන්ට .	
SFX 24 0 ුන්ටත් .	
SFX 24 0 ුන්ටයි .	
SFX 24 0 ාගෙන් .	
SFX 24 0 ාගෙනුත් .	
SFX 24 0 ාගෙනි .	
SFX 24 0 ෙකුගෙන් .	
SFX 24 0 ෙකුගෙනුත් .	
SFX 24 0 ෙකුගෙනි .	
SFX 24 0 ුන්ගෙන් .	
SFX 24 0 ුන්ගෙනුත් .	
SFX 24 0 ුන්ගෙනි .	
SFX 24 0 ාගේ .	
SFX 24 0 ාගේත් .	
SFX 24 0 ාගේයි .	
SFX 24 0 ාගෙ .	
SFX 24 0 ාගෙත් .	
SFX 24 0 ාගෙයි .	
SFX 24 0 ෙකුගේ .	
SFX 24 0 ෙකුගේත් .	
SFX 24 0 ෙකුගේයි .	
SFX 24 0  ුන්ගේ .	
SFX 24 0  ුන්ගේත් .	
SFX 24 0  ුන්ගේයි .	
SFX 24 0 ුනි .	
SFX 24 0 ෝ  .	

SFX 25 Y 26	
SFX 25 0 ු  .	
SFX 25 0 ුත්  .	
SFX 25 0 ුයි  .	
SFX 25 0 ෙකු .	
SFX 25 0 ුන්  .	
SFX 25 0 ුනුත්  .	
SFX 25 0 ුනි  .	
SFX 25 0 ෙකුට .	
SFX 25 0 ෙකුටත් .	
SFX 25 0 ෙකුටයි .	
SFX 25 0 ුන්ට .	
SFX 25 0 ුන්ටත් .	
SFX 25 0 ුන්ටයි .	
SFX 25 0 ෙකුගෙන් .	
SFX 25 0 ෙකුගෙනුත් .	
SFX 25 0 ෙකුගෙනි .	
SFX 25 0 ුන්ගෙන් .	
SFX 25 0 ුන්ගෙනුත් .	
SFX 25 0 ුන්ගෙනි .	
SFX 25 0 ෙකුගේ .	
SFX 25 0 ෙකුගේත් .	
SFX 25 0 ෙකුගේයි .	
SFX 25 0  ුන්ගේ .	
SFX 25 0  ුන්ගේත් .	
SFX 25 0  ුන්ගේයි .	
SFX 25 0 ුනි .	

SFX 27 Y 44 	
SFX 27 0 ු .	
SFX 27 0 ත් .	
SFX 27 0 යි .	
SFX 27 0 ක් .	
SFX 27 0 කුත් .	
SFX 27 0 කි .	
SFX 27 0 ුත් .	
SFX 27 0 ුයි .	
SFX 27 0 ෙන් .	
SFX 27 0 ෙනුත් .	
SFX 27 0 ෙනි .	
SFX 27 0  ින් .	
SFX 27 0  ිනුත් .	
SFX 27 0  ිනි .	
SFX 27 0 කින් .	
SFX 27 0  ිනුත් .	
SFX 27 0 කිනි .	
SFX 27 0 ුවලින් .	
SFX 27 0 ුවලිනුත් .	
SFX 27 0 ුවලිනි .	
SFX 27 0 ට .	
SFX 27 0 ටත් .	
SFX 27 0 ටයි .	
SFX 27 0 කට .	
SFX 27 0 කටත් .	
SFX 27 0 කටයි .	
SFX 27 0 ුවලට .	
SFX 27 0 ුවලටත් .	
SFX 27 0 ුවලටයි .	
SFX 27 0 ේ .	
SFX 27 0 ේත් .	
SFX 27 0 ේයි .	
SFX 27 0 ෙ .	
SFX 27 0 ෙත් .	
SFX 27 0 ෙයි .	
SFX 27 0 ක .	
SFX 27 0 කත් .	
SFX 27 0 කයි .	
SFX 27 0 ුවල .	
SFX 27 0 ුවලත් .	
SFX 27 0 ුවලයි .	
SFX 27 0 ෙහි .	
SFX 27 0 ෙහිත් .	
SFX 27 0 ෙහියි .	

SFX 28 Y 34	
SFX 28 0 ත් .	
SFX 28 0 යි .	
SFX 28 0 ක් .	
SFX 28 0 කුත් .	
SFX 28 0 කි .	
SFX 28 0 වල් .	
SFX 28 0 වලුත් .	
SFX 28 0 වලුයි .	
SFX 28 0 ෙන් .	
SFX 28 0 ෙනි .	
SFX 28 0 ිනුත් .	
SFX 28 0 ිනි .	
SFX 28 0 කින් .	
SFX 28 0 කිනුත් .	
SFX 28 0 වලින් .	
SFX 28 0 වලිනි .	
SFX 28 0 ට .	
SFX 28 0 කට .	
SFX 28 0 කටත් .	
SFX 28 0 කටයි .	
SFX 28 0 වලට .	
SFX 28 0 වලටත් .	
SFX 28 0 වලටයි .	
SFX 28 0 ේ .	
SFX 28 0 ේත් .	
SFX 28 0 ේයි .	
SFX 28 0 ෙ .	
SFX 28 0 ෙත් .	
SFX 28 0 ෙයි .	
SFX 28 0 ක .	
SFX 28 0 කයි .	
SFX 28 0 වලත් .	
SFX 28 0 ෙහිත් .	
SFX 28 0 ෙහියි .	

SFX 29 Y 47	
SFX 29 0 ව .	
SFX 29 0 වත් .	
SFX 29 0 වයි .	
SFX 29 0 වක් .	
SFX 29 0 වකුත් .	
SFX 29 0 වකි .	
SFX 29 0 ත් .	
SFX 29 0 යි .	
SFX 29 0 වෙන් .	
SFX 29 0 වෙනුත් .	
SFX 29 0 වෙනි .	
SFX 29 0 වකින් .	
SFX 29 0 වකිනුත් .	
SFX 29 0 වකිනි .	
SFX 29 0 වලින් .	
SFX 29 0 වලිනුත් .	
SFX 29 0 වලිනි .	
SFX 29 0 වට .	
SFX 29 0 වටත් .	
SFX 29 0 වටයි .	
SFX 29 0 වකට .	
SFX 29 0 වකටත් .	
SFX 29 0 වකටයි .	
SFX 29 0 වලට .	
SFX 29 0 වලටත් .	
SFX 29 0 වලටයි .	
SFX 29 0 වේ .	
SFX 29 0 වේත් .	
SFX 29 0 වේයි .	
SFX 29 0 වෙ .	
SFX 29 0 වෙත් .	
SFX 29 0 වෙයි .	
SFX 29 0 වක .	
SFX 29 0 වක .	
SFX 29 0 වකත් .	
SFX 29 0 වකත් .	
SFX 29 0 වකයි .	
SFX 29 0 වකයි .	
SFX 29 0 වල .	
SFX 29 0 වල .	
SFX 29 0 වලත් .	
SFX 29 0 වලත් .	
SFX 29 0 වලයි .	
SFX 29 0 වලයි .	
SFX 29 0 වෙහි .	
SFX 29 0 වෙහිත් .	
SFX 29 0 වෙහියි .	
