en_US.dic
කුලවත/18	
ගුණවත/18	
ජගත/18	
දුප්පත/18	
ධනවත/18	
නූගත/18	
පිංවත/18	
පින්වත/18	
පුත/18	
පෙම්වත/18	
පොහොසත/18	
පෝසත/18	
බලවත/18	
බැතිමත/18	
බීමත/18	
බුද්ධිමත/18	
භවත/18	
යුෂ්මත/18	
රසවත/18	
වංශවත/18	
විද්වත/18	
වියත/18	
ශක්තිමත/18	
සත/18	
සමත/18	
සැදැහැවත/18	
සිල්වත/18	
හිතවත/18	
අතහරින/19	
අදහන/19	
අපුල්ලන/19	
අඹරවන/19	
අවුස්සන/19	
අහුරන/19	
ඇඹරෙන/19	
ඇහැරෙන/19	
ඉඳින/19	
ඉසින/19	
උපදින/19	
උසුලන/19	
එසවෙන/19	
ඔතන/19	
කණින/19	
කලතන/19	
කැකෑරෙන/19	
කියන/19	
ගරන/19	
ගැහෙන/19	
ගොරවන/19	
තියන/19	
දරන/19	
දිනවන/19	
නංවන/19	
නහින/19	
නැසෙන/19	
නෙරපන/19	
පරයන/19	
පාන/19	
පැමිණෙන/19	
පිදෙන/19	
පිරිමදින/19	
පිළිගන්න/19	
පුම්බන/19	
පෙවෙන/19	
බදින/19	
බාන/19	
බෙදෙන/19	
මසන/19	
මියැදෙන/19	
යෙදවෙන/19	
රැකෙන/19	
ලියලන/19	
වටින/19	
වරද්දන/19	
වළඳින/19	
වැරදෙන/19	
විදහන/19	
විහිදෙන/19	
සනසන/19	
සලසන/19	
සෑදෙන/19	
සෙලවෙන/19	
හපන/19	
හැකිළෙන/19	
හික්මවන/19	
හූල්ලන/19	
අඟුට්ට/20	
අමුත්ත/20	
ඇත්ත/20	
ඉබ්බ/20	
කප්පිත්ත/20	
කැරපොත්ත/20	
කිනිතුල්ල/20	
කූඩැල්ල/20	
කෙළතොල්ල/20	
කොල්ල/20	
ගරිල්ල/20	
ගැත්ත/20	
ගුල්ල/20	
ගෙම්බ/20	
ගොළුබෙල්ල/20	
ගෝරිල්ල/20	
ගෝනුස්ස/20	
දිළින්ද/20	
නමැත්ත/20	
නිලමැස්ස/20	
නුවණැත්ත/20	
පැවිද්ද/20	
බයගුල්ල/20	
බල්ල/20	
බිංකුණ්ඩ/20	
බියගුල්ල/20	
බිල්ල/20	
බූවල්ල/20	
බෙල්ල/20	
බේබද්ද/20	
බෝනික්ක/20	
මහල්ල/20	
මැස්ස/20	
යමපල්ල/20	
යුත්ත/20	
රටවැස්ස/20	
ලොක්ක/20	
වස්ස/20	
වැඩිමහල්ල/20	
වැද්ද/20	
සිඟිත්ත/20	
සුද්ද/20	
සුදුස්ස/20	
හිතැත්ත/20	
ඇදුර/22
උකුණ/22
කණ/22
කපුට/22
කුකුළ/22
කූර/22
ගුරුළ/22
පසමිතුර/22
පිඹුර/22
පොරණැදුර/22
බකමූණ/22
බමුණ/22
බිහිර/22
මකුණ/22
මගුර/22
මසුර/22
මහැදුර/22
මිතුර/22
මුනුබුර/22
මොනර/22
යකැදුර/22
රකුස/22
රියැදුර/22
වඳුර/22
විනිසුර/22
වෙදැදුර/22
සතුර/22
සිකුර/22
සෙනසුර/22
සොහොයුර/22
සොයුර/22
හතුර/22
හිතමිතුර/22
අගමැතිතුම/23
අගවිනිසුරුතුම/23
අග්‍රවිනිශ්චයකාරතුම/23
අදිකාරම්තුම/23
අධ්‍යක්ෂතුම/23
අධ්‍යක්‍ෂතුම/23
ආචාර්යතුම/23
ආණ්ඩුකාරතුම/23
ආදිපාදතුම/23
ඇදුරුතුම/23
ඇමතිතුම/23
උතුම/23
එතුම/23
කථානායකතුම/23
ගුරුතුම/23
ජෙනරාල්තුම/23
ජනාධිපතිතුම/23
තුම/23
නායකතුම/23
පඬිතුම/23
පියතුම/23
පූජකතුම/23
මන්ත්‍රීතුම/23
මැතිතුම/23
මුදලිතුම/23
රජතුම/23
විද්‍යාලයාධිපතිතුම/23
විනිශ්චයකාරතුම/23
විපක්ෂනායකතුම/23
විපක්‍ෂනායකතුම/23
හමුදාපතිතුම/23
එඩේර/24
කින්නර/24
කුමර/24
කොර/24
ගුර/24
තිසර/24
දෙබර/24
බමර/24
බඹර/24
මකර/24
විනිසුර/24
මොනර/24
මෝර/24
සිත්තර/24
සොර/24
හොර/24
අධ්‍යක්ෂවර/25	
අධිනීතිඥවර/25	
අධිපතිවර/25	
අපෝස්තුලුවර/25	
අමාත්‍යවර/25	
ආඥාපතිවර/25	
ඇමතිවර/25	
ඉන්දියන්වර/25	
කර්තෘවර/25	
කළමනාකාරවර/25	
කොමියුනිස්ට්වර/25	
ග්‍රාමසේවකවර/25	
ගුරුවර/25	
තානාපතිවර/25	
දොස්තරවර/25	
නාහිමිවර/25	
පඬිවර/25	
ප්‍රධානාචාර්යවර/25	
ප්‍රමුඛාචාර්යවර/25	
මන්ත්‍රිවර/25	
මන්ත්‍රීවර/25	
මහත්වර/25	
මහාචාර්යවර/25	
මුදලිවර/25	
රදලවර/25	
ලුතිනන්වර/25	
ලේකම්වර/25	
විදුහල්පතිවර/25	
වෛද්‍යවර/25	
ශල්‍යවෛද්‍යවර/25	
සභාපතිවර/25	
සිටුවර/25	
ඍෂිවර/25	
හිමිවර/25	
අකුර/27	
අගුළ/27	
අඟුර/27	
අත්අකුර/27	
අතුර/27	
අනතුර/27	
අනාථකඳවුර/27	
අනුලකුණ/27	
අඳුර/27	
අමුණ/27	
අරමුණ/27	
අසුර/27	
ඇතුළ/27	
ඇසුර/27	
ඉසුර/27	
උගුර/27	
කතුර/27	
කඳුළ/27	
කැකුළ/27	
කුණ/27	
කූර/27	
ගනඳුර/27	
ගැඹුර/27	
ගිනිපුපුර/27	
ගිරිකුළ/27	
ඡේදලකුණ/27	
තඹුර/27	
තුටුපඬුර/27	
තෙලිතුඩ/27	
දකුණ/27	
නපුර/27	
නුදුර/27	
පඬුර/27	
පඳුර/27	
පවුර/27	
පැදුර/27	
පියයුර/27	
පිළිතුර/27	
පෙරමුණ/27	
පොකුර/27	
බුබුළ/27	
මදුළ/27	
මහකුර/27	
මළසිරුර/27	
මැදුර/27	
මුගුර/27	
මූණ/27	
යතුර/27	
ලකුණ/27	
වගුර/27	
සත්කුළ/27	
සඳුන්කූර/27	
සයුර/27	
ස්වරකුර/27	
සිරකඳවුර/27	
සිව්ර/27	
හකුර/27	
හුණුකූර/27	
අණ/28
අතුපතර/28
අපිළිවෙළ/28
අරපිරිමැස්ම/28
අවරදිග/28
ආර/28
ඇළදොළ/28
ඉණ/28
ඉර/28
උඩහ/28
එකවර/28
එතෙර/28
එවර/28
කටහඬ/28
කතර/28
කඳුරට/28
කලඹ/28
කැළිකසල/28
කෙටිමඟ/28
කොරහා/28
ගල්වළ/28
ගුවන්තොටුපොළ/28
ගොඩ/28
ඥානේන්ද්‍රිය/28
ණයවර/28
තාලම්පට/28
තිරපට/28
තෙර/28
තොටුපොළ/28
දම්සරණ/28
දියර/28
දුර/28
දෙකෙළවර/28
දෙපොළ/28
දේපළ/28
නකුට/28
නියර/28
පටුන/28
පහළ/28
පිට/28
පිරිවර/28
පිළිසඳර/28
පෙළවහ/28
බණ/28
බුදුසරණ/28
මඳ/28
මිහිපිට/28
මෙතෙර/28
රට/28
රැළ/28
වරද/28
වැඩ/28
විධුර/28
සක්වළ/28
සැර/28
සෙනසුරාදා/28
හිරු/28
ළදරුවිය/28
අභිඥා/29	
සපත්තු/29	
ස්ථායිතා/29	
ජුන්ටා/29	
දක්ෂතා/29	
රපෝර්තු/29	
හැන්දෑ/29	
කැරකොප්පු/29	
තුණ්ඩු/29	
සංහිතා/29	
සමරූපතා/29	
බාහු/29	
කුසලතා/29	
සීරා/29	
සංකල්පනා/29	
ප්‍රදක්ෂිණා/29	
වාට්ටු/29	
වටපිටා/29	
සකපෝරු/29	
නිඝණ්ඩු/29	
බෝමළු/29	
සමානාත්මතා/29	
ණයගනුදෙනු/29	
ක්‍රීඩා/29	
අකාර්යක්ෂමතා/29	
විලාසිතා/29	
සංගායනා/29	
අඩිකෝදු/29	
තුවක්කු/29	
සමානාත්මතා/29	
වගු/29	
රෙකමදාරු/29	
මැණික්කටු/29	
මුනුමුනු/29	
අඛණ්ඩතා/29	
පිස්සන්කොටු/29	
චිකිත්සා/29	
සංකා/29	
කථා/29	
බැංකු/29	
කුළුබඩු/29	
විස්කෝතු/29	
කයිවාරු/29	
චර්යාරටා/29	
තරඟමාලා/29	
මඩු/29	
ආකස්මිකතා/29	
නිශ්චලතා/29	
නිහඬතා/29	
දුෂ්කරතා/29	
අඩසිනා/29	
සාක්ෂරතා/29	
තලප්පා/29	
අසම්පූර්ණතා/29	
සමානත්මතා/29	
පරස්පරතා/29	
අවිද්‍යා/29	
ස්ප්‍රීතු/29	
